trunk/apertium-hbs-eng/apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="appl/y__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ies</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ied</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ied</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="enjoy__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="pa/y__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ys</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>id</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>id</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ab/ide__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ide</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ide</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ides</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ode</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ided</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ode</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ided</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>iding</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>iding</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>iding</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="approach__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>es</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="admit__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ted</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ted</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="fit__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>       <l>ted</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>       <l>ted</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="agree__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ar/ise__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ise</l>        <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ise</l>        <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ises</l>        <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ose</l>        <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>isen</l>        <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ising</l>        <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ising</l>        <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ising</l>        <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="emit"><i>emit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rally"><i>rall</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="parody"><i>parod</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grit"><i>grit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="repay"><i>repa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="singe"><i>singe</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="knot"><i>knot</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prohibit"><i>prohibit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vomit"><i>vomit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disqualify"><i>disqualif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fetch"><i>fetch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="empty"><i>empt</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="abet"><i>abet</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="access"><i>access</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="agree"><i>agree</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="agree to"><i>agree</i><par n="agree__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="agree with"><i>agree</i><par n="agree__vblex"/><p><l><b/>with</l><r><g><b/>with</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="apply for"><i>appl</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>for</l><r><g><b/>for</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="arise"><i>ar</i><par n="ar/ise__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="attach"><i>attach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="carry on"><i>carr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="chat"><i>chat</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="commit suicide"><i>commit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/><p><l><b/>suicide</l><r><g><b/>suicide</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="convey"><i>convey</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="crush"><i>crush</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="decree"><i>decree</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="defy"><i>defy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="delay"><i>delay</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deploy"><i>deploy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="destroy"><i>destroy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dignify"><i>dignify</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disagree"><i>disagree</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dismay"><i>dismay</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="display"><i>display</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dry"><i>dr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dye"><i>dye</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="echo"><i>echo</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="employ"><i>employ</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="finish seeing"><i>finish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/><p><l><b/>seeing</l><r><g><b/>seeing</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="fit"><i>fit</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="quit"><i>quit</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="free"><i>free</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="guess"><i>guess</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hurry"><i>hurr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lay off"><i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="lay down"><i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="lay"><i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prepay"><i>prepa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="marry"><i>marr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mass"><i>mass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="obey"><i>obey</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="omit"><i>omit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pay"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="preach"><i>preach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="push"><i>push</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rise"><i>r</i><par n="ar/ise__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rely"><i>rel</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="remit"><i>remit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="say"><i>sa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="say what"><i>sa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>what</l><r><g><b/>what</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="surpass"><i>surpass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="testify"><i>testif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="transmit"><i>transmit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ride"><i>r</i><par n="ab/ide__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pee"><i>pee</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wet"><i>wet</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="annoy"><i>annoy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pay cash"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>cash</l><r><g><b/>cash</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="pay out"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="pay back in the same coin"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>back<b/>in<b/>the<b/>same<b/>coin</l><r><g><b/>back<b/>in<b/>the<b/>same<b/>coin</g></r></p></e>
